Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1366
Imminent danger; department; powers.

(1) If the director determines that a crematory authority is operating a crematory so as to create an imminent danger of death or serious physical harm to persons employed at or in proximity to such crematory, he or she may order the temporary suspension or temporary limitation of the license of the crematory authority and may order the temporary closure of the crematory pending further action by the department. A hearing shall be held by the department no later than ten days after the date of such order. The department shall also simultaneously institute proceedings for revocation, suspension, or limitation of the license of the crematory authority.

(2) A continuance of the hearing under subsection (1) of this section shall be granted by the department upon written request from the crematory authority. Such continuance shall not exceed thirty days.

(3) A temporary suspension or temporary limitation order by the director under this section shall take effect when served upon the crematory authority and shall not exceed ninety days. If further action is not taken by the department within such period, the temporary suspension or temporary limitation shall expire.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 12.